Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.464

Reinvesting in youth program—Guidelines.

(1)(a) In order to receive funding through the reinvesting in youth program established pursuant to RCW 13.40.462, intervention service models must meet the following minimum criteria:

(i) There must be scientific evidence from at least one rigorous evaluation study of the specific service model that measures recidivism reduction;

(ii) There must be evidence that the specific service model's results can be replicated outside of an academic research environment;

(iii) The evaluation or evaluations of the service model must permit dollar cost estimates of both benefits and costs so that the benefit-cost ratio of the model can be calculated; and

(iv) The public taxpayer benefits to all levels of state and local government must exceed the service model costs.

(b) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008, the Washington state institute for public policy shall publish a list of service models that are eligible for reimbursement through the investing in youth program. As authorized by the board of the institute and to the extent necessary to respond to new research and information, the institute shall periodically update the list of service models. The institute shall use the technical advisory committee established in *RCW 13.40.462(5) to review and provide comments on the list of service models that are eligible for reimbursement.

(2) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008, the Washington state institute for public policy shall review and update the methodology for calculating cost savings resulting from implementation of this program. As authorized by the board of the institute and to the extent necessary to respond to new research and information, the institute shall periodically further review and update the methodology. As authorized by the board of the institute, when the institute reviews and updates the methodology for calculating cost savings, the institute shall provide an estimate of savings and avoided costs resulting from this program, along with a projection of future savings and avoided costs, to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The institute shall use the technical advisory committee established in *RCW 13.40.462(5) to review and provide comments on its methodology and cost calculations.

(3) In calendar year 2006, for use beginning in fiscal year 2008, the department shall establish a distribution formula to provide funding to local governments that implement research-based intervention services pursuant to this program. The department shall periodically update the distribution formula. The distribution formula shall require that the state allocation to local governments be proportional to the expected state government share of state and local government cost avoidance that would result from the implementation of such services based on the methodology maintained by the Washington state institute for public policy pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The department shall use the technical advisory committee established in *RCW 13.40.462(5) to review and provide comments on its proposed distribution formula.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 618; 2006 c 304 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 13.40.462 was amended by 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 4, deleting subsection (5).

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—Intent—Entitlement not created—Effective date—2006 c 304: See notes following RCW 13.40.462.